Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1756.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change The article heading of title 33, chapter 1, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "Arizona coordinate system, 1983" to "Arizona plane coordinate system". Sec. 2. Section 33-131, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-131. Arizona plane coordinate system; zones; composition A. The Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983, is the system of plane coordinates which that has been established by the national geodetic survey for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth in this state.  The Arizona plane coordinate system is a subset of the national state plan coordinate system and is divided into zones of geographic similarity across this state. B. The Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983, contains three zones as follows: 1. The west zone, composed of La Paz, Mohave and Yuma counties. 2. The central zone, composed of Coconino, Maricopa, Pima, Pinal, Santa Cruz and Yavapai counties. 3. The east zone, composed of Apache, Cochise, Gila, Graham, Greenlee and Navajo counties. is a component of the national spatial reference system as updated and PUBLISHED by the national geodetic survey.  The national spatial reference system is a national coordinate system that defines the elements of latitude, longitude, height, scale, gravity and ORIENTATION through the United States. C. In any land description map, report of survey or geospatial document in which the Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983, is utilized used, the system shall be designated as the "Arizona plane coordinate system", 1983, __________ zone", with the name of the appropriate zone inserted and appropriate metadata shall be included, which must include the NATIONAL spatial reference system reference frame, epoch date and name of the appropriate Arizona plane coordinate system zone. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 33-132, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-132. Coordinates of system A. The plane coordinates of a point on the earth's surface, to be used in the position or location of such point in the appropriate zone of the Arizona plane coordinate system, shall consist of two distances, expressed in feet and decimals of a foot (foot value 0.3048 meter exact). One of these distances, to be known as the "X-coordinate", or "Easting", shall give the position in an east-and-west direction, and the other, to be known as the "Y-coordinate", or "Northing", shall give the position in a north-and-south direction. These coordinates shall depend on and conform to the coordinates on the Arizona coordinate system, 1983, of the horizontal control stations of the national geodetic survey in this state, as these coordinates have been determined by the survey. Coordinates in the Arizona plane coordinate system shall be computed from the national spatial reference system latitude and longitude or vice versa using algorithms and mathematical formulas consistent with those published by the national geodetic survey.  The use of the term "Arizona plane coordinate system" or "AZPCS" on any map, report of survey or geospatial document must be limited to data that is referenced as prescribed by this article and must not have any additional scaling, rotating or translating or any other modifications. B. For the purpose of more precisely defining the Arizona plane coordinate system, the following definitions of the national spatial reference system of the national geodetic survey on the effective date of this amendment to this section are adopted. : 1. The Arizona coordinate system, 1983, west zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum, 1983, having a central meridian 113 o 45' 00" west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set one part in fifteen thousand too small. The origin of the coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 113 o 45' 00" west of Greenwich and the parallel of 31 o 00' 00" north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates of "X" equals seven hundred thousand feet and "Y" equals zero feet. 2. The Arizona coordinate system, 1983, central zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum, 1983, having a central meridian 111 o 55' 00" west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in ten thousand too small. The origin of the coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 o 55' 00" west of Greenwich and the parallel of 31 o 00' 00" north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates of "X" equals seven hundred thousand feet and "Y" equals zero feet. 3. The Arizona coordinate system, 1983, east zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum, 1983, having a central meridian 110 o 10' 00" west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set at one part in ten thousand too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 110 o 10' 00" west of Greenwich and the parallel of 31 o 00' 00" north latitude. The origin is given the coordinates of "X" equals seven hundred thousand feet and "Y" equals zero feet. C. When reported, orthometric heights must conform to standards adopted by the national geodetic survey for points included in the national spatial reference system.  Additional metadata must be included to document the orthometric heights, when determined and reported on the map, report of survey or geospatial document in which the Arizona plane coordinate system is used. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 33-133, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-133. Ground markings of system; accuracy standards; geodetic control stations A. The position of the Arizona plane coordinate system shall be marked on the ground by horizontal geodetic control stations, which have been established in conformity with standards adopted by the federal geodetic control committee for first order, second order class I or second order class II surveys or equivalent standards adopted by successors, at the time the surveys were made and computed on the North American datum, 1983 and specifications adopted by the national geodetic survey for points included in the national spatial reference system. B. A horizontal geodetic control station normally consists of, if practicable, a group of bronze, or brass discs or other metal disc imbedded in concrete posts nearly flush with the ground surface or cemented into holes a hole drilled into a rock outcrops outcrop, or ledges in such a configuration that the station is referenced by a subsurface mark in a precise vertical register with the surface mark, two reference marks, similar to the surface mark accurately located by azimuth and horizontal distance in respect to the horizontal control station and not more than one hundred fifty feet distant and an azimuth mark which may be similar to the horizontal control station not less than one thousand feet distant, or optionally, an object not less than three thousand feet distant such as a church spire, water tank, radio or television transmitting antenna, by which azimuth mark subsequent surveys may be accurately oriented STAINLESS STEEL RODS DRIVEN TO REFUSAL AND CASED IN GROUND ACCESS LIDS, MEASURING PIERS OR ANTENNA MASTS FOR DIRECT PLACEMENT OF SURVEYING INSTRUMENTS or other stable objects suitable for long-term perpetuation of coordinates. C. Horizontal Notwithstanding limitations to physical access prescribed by section 33-104, geodetic control stations shall be established, if practicable, in proximity to road intersections, hill or mountain tops and similar locations as an aid in the field searches for the horizontal control stations at publicly accessible locations, with public access to data and raw observables from automated observation sites in accordance with national geodetic survey guidelines when applicable.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 33-134, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-134. Map data located in more than one zone If a tract of land data to be defined by a single description extends from one into another of the coordinate into one or more adjacent zones established by this article, the position of all points on its boundaries may must be referred exclusively to as either of the two zones, one zone, with the zone which that is used being specifically named in the description map, report of survey or other document in which the Arizona plane coordinate system is used. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 33-135, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-135. Reliance of purchaser or mortgagee not required Nothing contained in This article requires does not require any purchaser or mortgagee to rely on any land description, any part of which depends exclusively on the Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 33-136, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-136. Public lands survey descriptions; conflicts; control If coordinates based on the Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983, are used to describe a tract of land which that in the same document is also described by reference to a subdivision, line or corner of the United States public land surveys, the description by coordinates shall be construed as supplemental to the basic description of the subdivision, line or corner contained in the official field notes and plat filed of record, and in the event of a conflict the description by reference to the subdivision, line or corner of the United States public land surveys prevails over the description by coordinates. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 33-137, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-137. Recording, filing, publishing extensions and densifications of the ground marking system A. Extensions and densifications of the ground marking system of the Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983, shall be executed in conformity with the standards and specifications of the federal geodetic control committee for first order, second order class I and second order class II surveys and computed on the North American datum, 1983 NATIONAL geodetic survey for data to be included in the national spatial reference system. B. The results of these surveys shall be published by a competent department of the federal government, such as the national geodetic survey, or a surveyor or engineer who is qualified to practice in this state, in which case the survey results shall bear a certification to the effect that the standards, specifications and guidelines of the federal geodetic control committee national GEODETIC SURVEY have been followed, and the designation and information prescribed by section 33-131 shall be included on the face of the published map, report of survey or geospatial document in which the Arizona plane coordinate system is used. C. Extensions and densifications of the ground marking system by first order, second order class I or second order class II methods only shall be used must use relevant national geodetic survey standards, specifications, guidelines and recommendations for data to be included in the national spatial reference system. Such extensions and densifications shall be integrated with previously established horizontal geodetic control stations of equal or higher order to form a matrix or network no part of which shall have positional errors exceeding those specified for class II second order. The spacing intervals shall not exceed three miles that are CONNECTED to and consistent with the national spatial reference system.  Coordinates that are determined for new stations must have positional accuracies that are consistent with those published by the national geodetic survey for national spatial reference stations in the vicinity of new stations. D. The results of these geodetic control station surveys are public domain and shall be duly recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county where the horizontal geodetic control station is situated or the publicly accessible database of the national geodetic survey, or both.  NOTWITHSTANDING that the survey results and data are public domain, PHYSICAL access to geodetic control stations is governed by section 33-104.END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 33-138, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-138. Recording prerequisite Coordinates based on the Arizona plane coordinate system, 1983, shall not be presented to be recorded in any public land records, map, report of survey or geospatial document unless the recording document also contains the descriptions of not less than two horizontal geodetic control stations of first order, second order class I or second order class II positional accuracy within the national spatial reference system as published by the national geodetic survey and which shall not exceed six miles from the nearest point or line of the land survey. END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Conditional enactment; notice A. This act does not become effective unless the national geodetic survey of the national ocean service, national oceanic and atmospheric administration, United States department of commerce publishes a notice in the federal register that the modernized national spatial reference system is approved. B. The state board of technical registration shall notify the director of the Arizona legislative council in writing on or before August 1, 2029 either: 1. Of the date on which the condition was met. 2. That the condition was not met.